Tennessee statutes. Title 66 Property
Part 6

Display of Flags

66-27-601. Part definitions.

As used in this part:

“Dedicatory instrument”:

Means each document governing the establishment, maintenance, or operation of a residential subdivision, planned unit development, condominium, horizontal property regime, or any similar planned development; and

Includes a declaration or similar instrument subjecting real property to:

Restrictive covenants, bylaws, or similar instruments governing the administration or operation of a homeowners' association;

Properly adopted rules and regulations of a homeowners' association; or

All lawful amendments to the covenants, bylaws, instruments, rules, or regulations of a homeowners' association;

“Homeowners' association” means an incorporated or unincorporated association owned by or whose members consist primarily of the owners of the property covered by the dedicatory instrument and through which the owners, or the board of directors or similar governing body, manage or regulate the residential subdivision, planned unit development, condominium, horizontal property regime, or any similar planned development; and

“Restrictive covenant” means any covenant, condition, or restriction contained in a dedicatory instrument, whether mandatory, prohibitive, permissive, or administrative.

Acts 2017, ch. 331, § 1.

Effective Dates. Acts 2017, ch. 331, § 3. July 1, 2017.

66-27-602. Display of flags by property owners.

Except as provided in subsection (b), no homeowners' association shall adopt or enforce a dedicatory instrument provision that prohibits, or has the effect of prohibiting, a property owner from displaying the flag of the United States of America or an official or replica flag of any branch of the United States armed forces, on the property owner's property.

A homeowners' association may adopt or enforce reasonable rules and regulations regarding the placement and manner for the display of the flag of the United States of America or an official or replica flag of any branch of the United States armed forces.

The property owner must display the flag of the United States of America in accordance with 4 U.S.C. §§ 5-10.

Acts 2017, ch. 331, § 1.

Effective Dates. Acts 2017, ch. 331, § 3. July 1, 2017.

66-27-603. Applicability of part.

This part shall apply to dedicatory instruments:

Created on or after July 1, 2017; or

Amended on or after July 1, 2017.

Acts 2017, ch. 331, § 1.

Effective Dates. Acts 2017, ch. 331, § 3. July 1, 2017.